Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3206
Respiratory care practitioner, defined.

Respiratory care practitioner means:

(1) Any person employed in the practice of respiratory care who has the knowledge and skill necessary to administer respiratory care to patients of all ages with varied cardiopulmonary diseases and to patients in need of critical care and who is capable of serving as a resource to the physician and other health professionals in relation to the technical aspects of respiratory care including effective and safe methods for administering respiratory care; and

(2) A person capable of supervising, directing, or teaching less skilled personnel in the provision of respiratory care services.

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 138;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 61;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,227;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1072.